Arkansas, session 2025, SB51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U091U PROSECUTOR COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(3) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE IT05
(4) G023C DEPUTY PROSECUTOR COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS13
(5) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS11
(6) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
*JAR027*
01/13/2025 8:39:14 AM JAR027

SB51
(7) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(8) G161C VICTIM/WITNESS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(9) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 12

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator, to be payable from the State
Central Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $949,957
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 313,245
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 250,152
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 4,692
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,518,046

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - LAW ENFORCEMENT AND PROSECUTORIAL PROGRAMS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator, to
be payable from the Law Enforcement and Prosecutor Drug Enforcement Training
Fund, for Law Enforcement and Prosecutor Drug Enforcement Training by the
Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) LAW ENFORCEMENT/PROSECUTORIAL PROGRAMS $70,660

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - JRJ LOAN REPAYMENT - FEDERAL. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator, to be
01/13/2025 8:39:14 AM JAR027

SB51
payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for refunds and reimbursements to eligible state and federal
public defenders and deputy prosecuting attorneys for qualified student loan
repayment of the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $88,881

SECTION 5. REGULAR SALARIES - PAWS FOR JUSTICE - STATE. There is
hereby established for the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) T118C CERTIFIED FACILITY DOG HANDLER PROG 1 GRADE GS11
(2) T120C CERTIFIED FACILITY DOG HANDLER I 2 GRADE GS08
(3) T119C CERTIFIED FACILITY DOG HANDLER II 3 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 6

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - PAWS FOR JUSTICE - STATE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator, to be payable from
the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $320,497
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 116,481
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 105,919
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 63,564
01/13/2025 8:39:14 AM JAR027

SB51
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $606,461

SECTION 7. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 8. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 9. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

01/13/2025 8:39:14 AM JAR027